Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,118
Improvements; petitions; restrictions.

Petitions after having been filed with the city shall not be returned or withdrawn, nor shall any person be allowed to add, cancel, erase, or withdraw or in any way modify any signature or writing thereon. Where two or more petitions are filed for the same improvement they shall be considered and taken together as one petition.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 35, p. 208.